src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Ter Sami language adjectives compare.

LEXICON A1
+Adj+Pred+Sg:%>0 #;
+Adj+Attr:%>есь  #;

LEXICON A2
+Adj+Pred+Sg:%>0 #;
+Adj+Attr:%>0    #;

LEXICON A3
+Adj+Attr:%>0 #;
+Adj+Pred+Sg:%>0 #;
+Adj+Pred+Pl:%>0 #;

LEXICON A4
+Adj+Attr:%>0 #;
+Adj+Pred+Sg:%>0 #;
+Adj+Pred+Pl:%>0 #;

LEXICON A5
+Adj+Attr:%>0 #;!unfinished

!LEXICON Comparisons
!+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
!+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
